California statutes. Education Code
(B) A pupil who has completed a suicide risk assessment and is determined to be at risk of suicide.

(C) A pupil who is attempting to physically harm themselves or others.

(4) “School mental health professional” means a school employee with a clear or preliminary pupil personnel services credential with a specialization in school counseling, school social work, or school psychology, a credentialed school
 nurse, or a licensed, registered, or associate marriage and family therapist, professional clinical counselor, clinical social worker, educational psychologist, or psychologist under the supervision of a school employee with a pupil personnel services or administrative services credential.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 645, Sec. 1.   (SB 1318)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

215.5.

(a) (1) Commencing July 1, 2025, a public school, including a charter school, or a private school that serves pupils in any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive, and that issues pupil identification cards shall have printed on either side of the pupil identification cards the number for the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline.

(2) Commencing October 1, 2020, a public school, including a charter school, or a private school that serves pupils in any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive, and that issues pupil identification cards shall have printed on either side of the pupil identification cards the telephone number for the National Domestic Violence Hotline: 1-800-799-7233.

(3) Commencing July 1, 2025, a public school, including a charter school, or a private school that serves pupils in any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive, and that issues pupil identification cards may have printed on either side of the pupil identification card a quick response (QR) code that links to the mental health resources internet website of the county in which the public or
 private school is located.

(4) Commencing July 1, 2026, a public school, including a charter school, that serves pupils in any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive, and that issues pupil identification cards shall have printed on either side of the pupil identification cards The Trevor Project’s LGBTQ+ suicide hotline that is available through both of the following options:

(A) Telephone number: 1-866-488-7386.

(B) Text line, which can be accessed by texting START to 678-678.

(b) (1) Commencing July 1, 2019, a public or private institution of higher education that issues student identification cards shall have printed on either side of the student identification cards the telephone number described in subparagraph (A) and may have printed on either side of the student identification cards the text line described in subparagraph (B) and the telephone numbers described in subparagraphs (C) and (D):

(A) The telephone number for the National Suicide Prevention Lifeline: 1-800-273-8255.

(B) The Crisis Text Line, which can be accessed by texting HOME to 741741.

(C) The campus police or security telephone number or, if the campus
 does not have a campus police or security telephone number, the local nonemergency telephone number.

(D) A local suicide prevention hotline telephone number.

(2) Commencing October 1, 2020, a public or private institution of higher education that issues student identification cards shall have printed on either side of the student identification cards the telephone number for either of the following:

(A) The National Domestic Violence Hotline: 1-800-799-7233.

(B) A local domestic violence hotline that provides confidential support services for students that have experienced domestic violence or stalking and is available by telephone 24 hours a day.

(3) Commencing July 1, 2026, a public institution of higher education that issues student identification cards shall have printed on either side of the student identification cards The Trevor Project’s LGBTQ+ suicide hotline that is available through both of the following options:

(A) Telephone number: 1-866-488-7386.

(B) Text line, which can be accessed by texting START to 678-678.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), if, as of January 1, 2020, a school subject to the requirements of subdivision (a), or a public or private institution of higher education subject to the requirements of subdivision (b), has a supply of unissued pupil or student identification cards that do not comply with the requirements of subdivision (a) or (b), as applicable, the school or the public or private institution of higher education shall issue those pupil or student identification cards until that supply is depleted.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), if, as of July 1, 2025, a school subject to the requirement of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) has a supply of unissued pupil identification cards that do not comply with the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a),
 the school shall issue those pupil identification cards until that supply is depleted.

(d) Subdivisions (a) and (b) apply for a pupil or student identification card issued for the first time to a pupil or student, and to a pupil or student identification card issued to replace a damaged or lost pupil or student identification card.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2025.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 642, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 483, Sec. 2.   (AB 727)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

216.

(a) The Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission shall, in consultation with the department and the State Department of Public Health, develop an evidence based online training program that is accessible, free of charge, and available statewide to train school staff serving pupils in kindergarten or in any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, pupils who are 13 years of age or older, and parents, guardians, or caregivers of pupils in kindergarten or in any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive,
 as part of the local educational agency’s policy on pupil suicide prevention adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 215.

(b) In developing an online training program pursuant to subdivision (a), the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission shall ensure all of the following:

(1) The training program is evidence based, trauma informed, and culturally and linguistically competent.

(2) The training program is consistent with the model pupil suicide prevention policy developed by the department pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 215.

(3) The training program addresses the needs of high-risk groups as
 specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 215.

(4) The training program can track aggregate, statewide usage.

(5) The training program can assess trainee knowledge before and after training is provided in order to measure training outcomes.

(c) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a county office of education, school district, state special school, or charter school that serves pupils in kindergarten or in any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 92, Sec. 1.   (AB 2003)   Effective July 16, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

216.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a county office of education, school district, state special school, or charter school that serves pupils in kindergarten or in any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(b) A local educational agency that conducts suicide risk screenings, including as provided under a school-linked behavioral health program or the local educational agency’s policy on pupil suicide prevention adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 215, shall report, on or before June 30, 2027, and June 30 annually thereafter, the number of pupils screened, and which screening instruments were used, for the reporting year, to the
 department. This section shall not be construed to require a local educational agency to conduct suicide risk screenings.

(c) In collecting and reporting data pursuant to subdivision (b), the local educational agency shall ensure that data is reported in a deidentified, aggregate format that protects pupil privacy consistent with state and federal data privacy laws.

(d) The department shall compile the data reported pursuant to this section through existing data reporting processes and post statewide aggregate data on its internet website to inform policy and program development.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 92, Sec. 2.   (AB 2003)   Effective July 16, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.6. Supports and Resources for Parents, Guardians, and Families of Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, Transgender, Queer, and Questioning Pupils [217. - 217.]

217.

(a) (1) The department shall develop resources, or, as appropriate, update existing resources, for supports and community resources for the support of parents, guardians, and families of lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, and questioning (LGBTQ) pupils and strategies to increase support for LGBTQ pupils and thereby improve overall school and community climate. The resources shall be designed for use in schools operated by a school district or county office of education and charter schools serving pupils in grades 7 to 12, inclusive.

(2) The department shall develop the supports and community resources for parents, guardians, and families of LGBTQ pupils in collaboration with parents, guardians, and families of,
 including, but not limited to, LGBTQ pupils.

(b) The department shall periodically update the supports and community resources for the support of parents, guardians, and families of LGBTQ pupils to reflect changes in law.

(c) (1) As used in this section, school-based supports and community resources for the support of parents, guardians, and families of LGBTQ pupils include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Parents, guardians, and families of LGBTQ pupils support groups or affinity clubs and organizations.

(B) Safe spaces for parents, guardians, and families of LGBTQ pupils.

(C) Antibullying and harassment policies and related complaint procedures for
 parents, guardians, and families to access.

(D) Counseling services.

(E) School staff who have received antibias or other training aimed at supporting LGBTQ youth and their parents, guardians, and families.

(F) Suicide prevention policies and related procedures for parents, guardians, and families to access.

(2) As used in this section, community resources for the support of parents, guardians, and families of LGBTQ pupils include, but are not limited to, both of the following:

(A) Local community-based organizations that provide support to parents, guardians, and families of LGBTQ youth.

(B) Local physical and mental health
 providers with experience in treating and supporting parents, families, and guardians of LGBTQ youth.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 95, Sec. 3.   (AB 1955)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.7. Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, Transgender, Queer, and Questioning Pupil Resources [218. - 219.]

218.

(a) No later than July 1, 2021, the department shall develop resources or, as appropriate, update existing resources for in-service training on schoolsite and community resources for the support of lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, and questioning (LGBTQ) pupils and strategies to increase support for LGBTQ pupils and thereby improve overall school climate. The resources shall be designed for use in schools operated by a school district or county office of education and charter schools serving pupils in grades 7 to 12, inclusive.

(b) The department shall periodically update the schoolsite and community resources for the support of LGBTQ
 pupils to reflect changes in law.

(c) (1) As used in this section, schoolsite resources for the support of LGBTQ pupils include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Peer support or affinity clubs and organizations.

(B) Safe spaces for LGBTQ pupils.

(C) Antibullying and harassment policies and related complaint procedures.

(D) Counseling services.

(E) School staff who have received antibias or other training aimed at supporting LGBTQ youth.

(F) Health
 and other curriculum materials that are inclusive of, and relevant to, LGBTQ youth.

(G) Suicide prevention policies and related procedures.

(H) Policies relating to use of school facilities, including, but not limited to, bathrooms and locker rooms.

(I) Policies and procedures to protect the privacy of LGBTQ pupils.

(2) As used in this section, community resources for the support of LGBTQ pupils include, but are not limited to, both of the following:

(A) Local community-based organizations that provide support to LGBTQ youth.

(B) Local physical and mental health providers with experience in treating and supporting LGBTQ youth.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 220, Sec. 2.   (AB 5)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

218.3.

(a) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school, serving pupils in any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive.

(b) (1) On or before July 1, 2025, the department shall finalize the development of an online training delivery platform and online training curriculum to support lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, and questioning (LGBTQ) cultural competency training for teachers and other certificated employees.

(2) The department may use resources developed pursuant to Section 148 of Chapter 44 of the Statutes of
 2021 or Provisions 47 to 49, inclusive, of Item 6100-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2021 (Chapters 21, 69, and 240 of the Statutes of 2021) to meet the requirements of paragraph (1).

(3) At a minimum, the training in paragraph (1) shall include information on all of the following topics:

(A) The creation of safe and supportive learning environments for LGBTQ+ pupils, including those with multiple intersecting identities, including, but not limited to, those who are members of the LGBTQ+ community, members of communities of color, immigrants, or people living with the human immunodeficiency virus.

(B) Identifying LGBTQ+ youth who are subject to, or may be at risk of, bullying and lack of acceptance at
 home or in their communities.

(C) The provision of targeted support services to LGBTQ+ youth, including counseling services.

(D) Requirements regarding school antibullying and harassment policies, and complaint procedures.

(E) Requirements regarding suicide prevention policies and related procedures.

(F) Requirements regarding policies relating to use of school facilities, including, but not limited to, bathrooms and locker rooms.

(G) Requirements regarding policies and procedures to protect the privacy of LGBTQ+ pupils.

(H) The importance of identifying local, community-based organizations that provide support to LGBTQ+ youth.

(I) The importance of identifying local physical and mental health providers with experience in treating and supporting LGBTQ+ youth.

(J) The formation of peer support or affinity clubs and organizations.

(K) The importance of school staff who have received antibias or other training aimed at supporting LGBTQ+ youth.

(L) Health and other curriculum materials that are inclusive of, and relevant to, LGBTQ+ youth.

(c) Commencing with the 2025–26 school year, and continuing through
 the 2029–30 school year, a local educational agency shall provide and require at least one hour of training annually to all teachers and other certificated employees serving pupils in grades 7 to 12, inclusive, in a manner designed to cover the core elements of the curriculum developed pursuant to subdivision (b) over the five-year period. A teacher or certificated employee shall be exempt from the annual requirement if they completed the required training within the same year at another local educational agency in this state. All of the following shall apply to the training under this section:

(1) A local educational agency may provide the training using the online training curriculum and platform pursuant to subdivision (b) or with in-service training using the resources developed by the department pursuant to Section 218 that meets the
 requirements of this section.

(2) A local educational agency
 shall maintain records documenting both of the following:

(A) The date that each employee satisfied the requirements of this section.

(B) The name of the entity that provided the training.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, a local educational agency shall maintain the records required in paragraph (2) according to their local retention schedule after employees receive the training and make the records available to the department upon request, as part of the department’s annual compliance monitoring of state and federal programs. These records are public records subject to disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(4) A local educational agency shall ensure that teachers and all other certificated employees complete the training required by this section on paid time during the employees’ regular work hours or designated professional development hours unless otherwise negotiated and mutually agreed upon with the employees’ exclusive representative.

(5) Employees may complete training individually or as part of a group presentation and the training may be
 completed in shorter segments as long as the applicable hourly total requirement is met.

(d) A local educational agency shall ensure that the in-service training it chooses to use as an alternative to the online training pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) is substantially similar to and meets the same standards of the online training described in this
 section.

(e) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a local educational agency from providing longer, more frequent, relevant in-service training to meet the online training standards, provided that it is mutually agreed to with the employee’s exclusive representative.

(f) (1) The department shall monitor compliance with the training requirement pursuant to subdivision (c) through its existing annual compliance monitoring of state and federal programs.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall provide a report to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature within nine months after the conclusion of the 2029–30
 school year, summarizing the data collected through compliance monitoring over the five-year period, including the local educational agencies selected for monitoring and relevant compliance findings, if any, pursuant to this section. The department shall publicly post the report on its internet website.

(3) The report required by paragraph (2) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(g) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2031, and, as of January 1, 2032, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 220, Sec. 3.   (AB 5)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Inoperative July 1, 2031, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

219.

(a) On or before July 1, 2024, the Superintendent shall convene an advisory task force to identify the needs of lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, questioning, and plus (LGBTQ+) pupils and to make recommendations to assist in implementing supportive policies and initiatives to address LGBTQ+ pupil education and well-being, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Pupil mental health and feelings of safety and
 support.

(2) Inclusive and safe access to school facilities.

(3) Inclusive instructional material and school curriculum.

(4) Prevention of, response to, and oversight of, bullying and harassment
 to determine the effectiveness of policies and programs.

(5) Inclusive participation in campus activities.

(b) The advisory task force members shall include, at a minimum, 15 members representative of all of the following groups:

(1) Eight pupils identifying as members of the LGBTQ+ community who are enrolled in a California high school.

(2) One public school administrator currently employed by a local educational agency.

(3) Two certificated public school teachers currently employed by a local educational agency.

(4) Two mental health professionals, with a preference for those who practice LGBTQ+ affirming care.

(5) One community LGBTQ+ advocate, with a preference for one with programmatic expertise.

(6) One representative from the Office of Health Equity established by the State Department of Public Health.

(c) (1) To the extent practicable, the members of the advisory task force shall represent the geographical, racial, ethnic,
 socioeconomic, cultural, physical, and educational diversity of California’s LGBTQ+ community.

(2) Members of the advisory task force shall be selected by the Superintendent or their designee.

(d) (1) On or before January 1, 2026, the advisory task force shall report their findings and recommendations to the Legislature, the Superintendent, and the Governor. At the request of any member of the advisory task force, the report may include minority findings and recommendations.

(2) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under paragraph (1) is inoperative on January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(3) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 228, Sec. 1.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Prohibition of Discrimination [220. - 221.1.]

220.

No person shall be subjected to discrimination on the basis of disability, gender, gender identity, gender expression, nationality, race or ethnicity, religion, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic that is contained in the definition of hate crimes set forth in Section 422.55 of the Penal Code, including immigration status, in any program or activity conducted by an educational institution that receives, or benefits from, state financial assistance, or enrolls pupils who receive state student financial aid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 493, Sec. 3.   (AB 699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

220.1.

An employee or a contractor of a school district, county office of education, charter school, or state special school for the blind or the deaf, or a member of the governing board of a school district or county office of education or a member of the governing body of a charter school, shall not in any manner retaliate or take adverse action against any employee, including by placing the employee on administrative leave, on the basis that the employee (a) supported a pupil in the exercise of rights set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 200) of, Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 218) of, Article 3 (commencing with Section 220) of, or Article 4 (commencing with Section 221.5) of, this chapter, (b) performed the employee’s work activities in a manner consistent with the recommendations or employer obligations set forth in
 this chapter, or (c) provided instruction to pupils consistent with the current content standards, curriculum frameworks, and instructional materials adopted by the state board, and any other requirements of this code, including, but not limited to, Section 51204.5 and the California Healthy Youth Act (Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 51930) of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 95, Sec. 4.   (AB 1955)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

220.3.

(a) An employee or a contractor of a school district, county office of education, charter school, or state special school for the blind or the deaf shall not be required to disclose any information related to a pupil’s sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression to any other person without the pupil’s consent unless otherwise required by state or federal law.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 95, Sec. 5.   (AB 1955)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

220.5.

(a) A school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school for the blind or the deaf, or a member of the governing board of a school district or county office of education or a member of the governing body of a charter school, shall not enact or enforce any policy, rule, or administrative regulation that would require an employee or a contractor to disclose any information related to a pupil’s sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression to any other person without the pupil’s consent, unless otherwise required by state or federal law.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, existing law.

(c) Any policy,
 regulation, guidance, directive, or other action of a school district, county office of education, charter school, or state special school for the blind or the deaf, or a member of the governing board of a school district or county office of education or a member of the governing body of a charter school, that is inconsistent with subdivision (a) is invalid and shall not have any force or effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 95, Sec. 6.   (AB 1955)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

221.

This article shall not apply to an educational institution that is controlled by a religious organization if the application would not be consistent with the religious tenets of that organization.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 220.5 by Stats. 2007, Ch. 569, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

221.1.

The State Board of Education shall adopt regulations pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, commonly referred to as the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, to implement this chapter.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 232 by Stats. 1998, Ch. 914, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. The California Racial Mascots Act [221.2. - 221.3.]

221.2.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The use of racially derogatory or discriminatory school or athletic team names, mascots, or nicknames in California public schools is antithetical to the California school mission of providing an equal education to all.

(b) Certain athletic team names, mascots, and nicknames that have been used and remain in use by other teams, including school teams, in other parts of the nation are discriminatory in singling out the Native American community for the derision to which mascots or nicknames are often subjected.

(c) Many individuals and organizations interested and experienced in human relations, including the United States Commission on Civil Rights, have concluded that the use of Native American images and names in school sports is a barrier to equality and understanding, and that all residents of the United States would benefit from the discontinuance of their use.

(d) No individual or school has a cognizable interest in retaining a racially derogatory or discriminatory school or athletic team name, mascot, or nickname.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 767, Sec. 1.   (AB 30)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

221.3.

(a) For purposes of this section, “derogatory Native American term” includes, but is not necessarily limited to, Apaches, Big Reds, Braves, Chiefs, Chieftains, Chippewa, Comanches, Indians, Savages, Squaw, and Tribe.

(b) (1) All public schools, except for a school operated by an Indian tribe or a tribal organization, are prohibited from using the term Redskins for school or athletic team names, mascots, or nicknames.

(2) Commencing July 1, 2026, all public schools, except for a school operated by an Indian tribe or a tribal organization, are prohibited from using any derogatory Native American term for
 school or athletic team names, mascots, or nicknames.

(c) Notwithstanding this section, a public school may continue to use uniforms or other materials bearing a derogatory Native American term as a school or athletic team name, mascot, or nickname that were purchased before July 1, 2026, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The school selects a new school or athletic team name, mascot, or nickname.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the school refrains from purchasing or acquiring, for the purpose of distribution or sale to pupils or school employees, any uniform that includes or bears the derogatory Native American term.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), before January 1, 2028, a school using uniforms that bear the derogatory Native American term may purchase or acquire a number of uniforms equal to up to 20 percent of the total number of uniforms used by a team or band at that school during the 2025–26 school year for the purposes of replacing damaged or lost uniforms.

(3) The school refrains from purchasing or acquiring, for the purpose of distribution or sale to pupils or school employees, any yearbook, newspaper, program, or other similar material that includes or bears the prohibited school or athletic team name, mascot, nickname, or related title in its logo or cover title.

(4) The school refrains from purchasing or constructing a marquee, sign, gymnasium floor, or other new or
 replacement fixture that includes or bears the prohibited school or athletic team name, mascot, or nickname. This paragraph applies to facilities that bear the prohibited school or athletic team name, mascot, or nickname, in which case the school shall remove the prohibited name, mascot, or nickname no later than the next time the associated part of the facility is replaced in the normal course of maintenance.

(d) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that implementation of a new school or athletic team name, mascot, or nickname results in a requirement to purchase or replace materials or fixtures when they would have needed to be purchased or replaced without the enactment of this article.

 (2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), it is the intent of the Legislature
 that the purchase or replacement of materials or fixtures due to implementation of a new school or athletic team name, mascot, or nickname pursuant to this section occur before the 2028–29 school year.

(e) This section shall not apply to a public school that receives written consent from a local federally recognized tribe to use a derogatory Native American term for the school or an athletic team name, mascot, or nickname.

(f) This section is not subject to waiver by the state board pursuant to Section 33050, except as specified in this section.

(g) This section shall not apply to campuses of the California Community Colleges, the California State University,
 or the University of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 665, Sec. 1.   (AB 3074)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Sex Equity in Education Act [221.5. - 231.7.]

221.5.

(a) It is the policy of the state that elementary and secondary school classes and courses, including nonacademic and elective classes and courses, be conducted, without regard to the sex of the pupil enrolled in
 these classes and courses.

(b) A school district shall not prohibit a pupil from enrolling in any class or course on the basis of the sex of the pupil, except a class subject to Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 51930) of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2.

(c) A school district shall not require a pupil of one sex to enroll in a particular class or course, unless the same class or course is also required of a pupil of the opposite sex.

(d) A school counselor, teacher, instructor, administrator, or aide shall not, on the basis of the sex of a pupil, offer vocational or school program guidance to a pupil of one sex that is different from that offered to a pupil of the opposite sex or, in counseling a pupil, differentiate career, vocational, or higher education opportunities on the basis of the sex of the pupil
 counseled. Any school personnel acting in a career counseling or course selection capacity to a pupil shall affirmatively explore with the pupil the possibility of careers, or courses leading to careers, that are nontraditional for that pupil’s sex. The parents or legal guardian of the pupil shall be notified in a general manner at least once in the manner prescribed by Section 48980, in advance of career counseling and course selection commencing with course selection for grade 7 so that they may participate in the counseling sessions and decisions.

(e) Participation in a particular physical education activity or sport, if required of pupils of one sex, shall be available to pupils of each sex.

(f) A pupil shall be permitted to participate in sex-segregated school programs and activities, including athletic teams and competitions, and use facilities consistent with his or her
 gender identity, irrespective of the gender listed on the pupil’s records.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 25.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

221.51.

(a) A local educational agency shall not apply any rule concerning a pupil’s actual or potential parental, family, or marital status that treats pupils differently on the basis of sex.

(b) A local educational agency shall not exclude nor deny any pupil from any educational program or activity, including class or extracurricular activity, solely on the basis of the pupil’s pregnancy, childbirth, false pregnancy, termination of pregnancy, or recovery therefrom.

(c) A local educational agency may require any pupil to obtain the certification of a physician or nurse practitioner that the pupil is physically and emotionally able to continue participation in the regular education program
 or activity.

(d) Pregnant or parenting pupils shall not be required to participate in pregnant minor programs or alternative education programs. Pregnant or parenting pupils who voluntarily participate in alternative education programs shall be given educational programs, activities, and courses equal to those they would have been in if participating in the regular education program.

(e) A local educational agency shall treat pregnancy, childbirth, false pregnancy, termination of pregnancy, and recovery therefrom in the same manner and under the same policies as any other temporary disabling condition.

(f) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, a county office of education, a school operated by a school district or a county office of education, a charter school, the
 California Schools for the Deaf, or the California School for the Blind.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 942, Sec. 2.   (AB 2289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

221.6.

On or before July 1, 2006, the department shall post on its Internet Web site, in both English and Spanish and at a reading level that may be comprehended by pupils in high school, the information set forth in the federal regulations implementing Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 52.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

221.61.

(a) On or before July 1, 2017, public schools, private schools that receive federal funds and are subject to the requirements of Title IX, school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools shall post in a prominent and conspicuous location on their Internet Web sites all of the following:

(1) The name and contact information of the Title IX coordinator for that public school, private school, school district, county office of education, or charter school, which shall include the Title IX coordinator’s phone number and email address.

(2) The rights of a pupil and the public and the
 responsibilities of the public school, private school, school district, county office of education, or charter school under Title IX, which shall include, but shall not be limited to, Internet Web links to information about those rights and responsibilities located on the Internet Web sites of the department’s Office for Equal Opportunity and the United States Department of Education Office of Civil Rights, and the list of rights specified in Section 221.8.

(3) A description of how to file a complaint under Title IX, which shall include all of the following:

(A) An explanation of the statute of limitations within which a complaint must be filed after an alleged incident of discrimination has occurred, and how a complaint may be filed beyond the statute of limitations.

(B) An explanation of how the complaint will be investigated and how the complainant may further pursue the complaint, including, but not limited to, Internet Web links to this information on the United States Department of Education Office for Civil Rights’ Internet Web site.

(C) An Internet Web link to the United States Department of Education Office for Civil Rights complaints form, and the contact information for the office, which shall include the phone number and email address for the office.

(b) On or before April 1, 2017, and annually thereafter, the Superintendent shall send a letter through electronic means to all public schools, private schools that receive federal funds and are subject to the
 requirements of Title IX, school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools informing them of the requirement specified in subdivision (a) and of their responsibilities under Title IX.

(c) A public school that does not maintain an Internet Web site may comply with subdivision (a) by posting the information specified in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a) on the Internet Web site of its school district or county office of education.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a school or local educational agency to establish an Internet Web site if the school or local educational agency does not already maintain one.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 655, Sec. 2.   (SB 1375)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

221.7.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that female pupils are not accorded opportunities for participation in school-sponsored athletic programs equal to those accorded male pupils. It is the intent of the Legislature that opportunities for participation in athletics be provided equally to male and female pupils.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, no public funds shall be used in connection with any athletic program conducted under the auspices of a